Indiana, session 2026, HB1171.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-18.5-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.118-2022,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A person may apply to the bureau for a
personalized license plate to display on the person's vehicle.
(b) The following license plates may be designed as a personalized
license plate under this chapter:
(1) IC 9-18.5-4 (prisoner of war license plates).
(2) IC 9-18.5-5 (disabled Hoosier veteran license plates).
(3) IC 9-18.5-6 (Purple Heart license plates).
(4) IC 9-18.5-7 (National Guard license plates).
(5) IC 9-18.5-8 (license plates for persons with disabilities).
(6) IC 9-18.5-9 (amateur radio operator license plates).
(7) IC 9-18.5-10 (civic event license plates).
(8) IC 9-18.5-11 (In God We Trust license plates).
(9) IC 9-18.5-12 (special group recognition license plates).
(10) IC 9-18.5-13 (environmental license plates).
(11) IC 9-18.5-14 (kids first trust license plates).
2026 IN 1171—LS 6233/DI 137


(12) IC 9-18.5-15 (education license plates).
(13) IC 9-18.5-16 (Indiana FFA trust license plates).
(14) IC 9-18.5-17 (Indiana firefighter license plates).
(15) IC 9-18.5-18 (Indiana boy scouts trust license plates).
(16) IC 9-18.5-19 (D.A.R.E. Indiana trust license plates).
(17) IC 9-18.5-20 (Indiana arts trust license plates).
(18) IC 9-18.5-21 (Indiana health trust license plates).
(19) IC 9-18.5-22 (Indiana Native American trust license plates).
(20) IC 9-18.5-24 (Pearl Harbor survivor license plates).
(21) IC 9-18.5-25 (Indiana state educational institution trust
license plates).
(22) IC 9-18.5-26 (Lewis and Clark expedition license plates).
(23) IC 9-18.5-27 (Riley Children's Foundation license plates).
(24) IC 9-18.5-28 (National Football League franchised
professional football team license plates).
(25) IC 9-18.5-29 (Hoosier veteran license plates).
(26) IC 9-18.5-30 (support our troops license plates).
(27) IC 9-18.5-31 (Abraham Lincoln's boyhood home license
plates).
(28) IC 9-18.5-33 (Indiana Gold Star family member license
plates).
(29) IC 9-18.5-35 (Armed Forces Expeditionary Medal license
plates).
(30) IC 9-18.5-37 (epilepsy foundation trust license plates).
(30) (31) A license plate issued under IC 9-18 (before its
expiration) or IC 9-18.1.
SECTION 2. IC 9-18.5-37 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 37. Epilepsy Foundation Trust License Plates
Sec. 1. The bureau shall design and issue an epilepsy foundation
trust license plate. The epilepsy foundation trust license plate shall
be designed and issued as a special group recognition license plate
under IC 9-18.5-12 and must include the following:
(1) A basic design for the plate, with consecutive numbers or
letters, or both, to properly identify the vehicle.
(2) A background design, an emblem, or colors that designate
the license plate as an epilepsy foundation trust license plate.
(3) Any other information the bureau considers necessary.
Sec. 2. A person that is eligible to register a vehicle under this
title is eligible to receive an epilepsy foundation trust license plate
under this chapter upon doing the following:
2026 IN 1171—LS 6233/DI 137


(1) Completing an application for an epilepsy foundation trust
license plate.
(2) Paying the fees under section 3 of this chapter.
Sec. 3. (a) The bureau shall collect the following fees for an
epilepsy foundation trust license plate:
(1) An annual supplemental fee of fifteen dollars ($15) under
IC 9-18.5-12-16.
(2) An annual fee of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25)
under IC 9-18.5-12-14(d)(2) or IC 9-18.5-12-15(b).
(b) The bureau shall collect the annual fee described in
subsection (a)(2) and deposit the annual fee in the epilepsy
foundation trust fund established by section 4 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. (a) The epilepsy foundation trust fund is established.
(b) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the epilepsy
foundation trust fund not currently needed to meet the obligations
of the epilepsy foundation trust fund in the same manner as other
public trust funds are invested. Interest that accrues from these
investments shall be deposited in the epilepsy foundation trust
fund.
(c) The bureau shall administer the epilepsy foundation trust
fund. Expenses of administering the epilepsy foundation trust fund
shall be paid from money in the epilepsy foundation trust fund.
(d) The bureau shall distribute at least one (1) time each month
the money from the epilepsy foundation trust fund to the Epilepsy
Foundation Indiana.
(e) Money in the epilepsy foundation trust fund at the end of the
state fiscal year does not revert to the state general fund.
2026 IN 1171—LS 6233/DI 137